California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) (1) For each conviction of a person for an offense specified in subdivision (d), committed while the person was under 21 years of age, but 13 years of age or older, the court shall suspend the person’s driving privilege for one year. If the person convicted does not yet have the privilege to drive, the court shall order the department to delay issuing the privilege to drive for one year subsequent to the time the person becomes legally eligible to drive. However, if there is no further conviction for an offense specified in subdivision (d) in a 12-month period after the conviction, the court, upon petition of the person affected, may modify the order imposing the delay of the privilege. For each successive offense, the court shall suspend the person’s driving
 privilege for those possessing a license or delay the eligibility for those not in possession of a license at the time of their conviction for one additional year.

(2) As used in this section, the term “conviction” includes the findings in juvenile proceedings specified in Section 13105.

(b) Whenever the court suspends driving privileges pursuant to subdivision (a), the court in which the conviction is had shall require all driver’s licenses held by the person to be surrendered to the court. The court shall within 10 days following the conviction transmit a certified abstract of the conviction, together with any driver’s licenses surrendered, to the department.

(c) (1) After a court has issued an order suspending or delaying driving privileges pursuant to subdivision (a), the court, upon
 petition of the person affected, may review the order and may impose restrictions on the person’s privilege to drive based upon a showing of a critical need to drive.

(2) As used in this section, “critical need to drive” means the circumstances that are required to be shown for the issuance of a junior permit pursuant to Section 12513.

(3) The restriction shall remain in effect for the balance of the period of suspension or restriction in this section. The court shall notify the department of any modification within 10 days of the order of modification.

(d) This section applies to violations involving controlled substances or alcohol contained in the following provisions:

(1) Section 191.5 of, and subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal
 Code.

(2) Section 23103 when subject to Section 23103.5, Section 23140, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 23152) of Chapter 12 of Division 11 of this code.

(e) Suspension, restriction, or delay of driving privileges pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any penalty imposed upon conviction of a violation specified in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 505, Sec. 12.   (SB 485)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.8.

The restrictions specified in Section 13202.5 for the violations specified in that section may include, but are not limited to, the installation and maintenance of a certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 13386. Any restriction is subject to the provisions of Section 13202.5 relating to restrictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.33.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

In no event shall a court suspend the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle or as a condition of probation prohibit the operation of a motor vehicle for a period of time longer than that specified in this code. Any such prohibited order of a court, whether imposed as a condition of probation or otherwise, shall be null and void, and the department shall restore or reissue a license to any person entitled thereto irrespective of any such invalid order of a court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1283.)
-------------------------------------------

13205.

The privileges of a nonresident to operate vehicles in this State may be suspended or revoked under the provisions of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as the privileges of a resident driver.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13206.

Whenever a court suspends the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle, the court shall require the person’s license to be surrendered to it. Unless required by the provisions of Section 13550 to send the license to the department, the court shall retain the license during the period of suspension and return it to the licensee at the end of the period after indorsing thereon a record of the suspension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13207.

Whenever a court suspends the privilege of any person to operate a motor vehicle, the suspension shall apply to all driver’s licenses held by him, and all licenses shall be surrendered to the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13208.

In any criminal proceeding, without regard to its disposition, wherein the defendant is charged with a violation of Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000), the court may, if it has reason to believe that any of the conditions specified in Section 12805 or 12806 exist, recommend to the department that an investigation be conducted to determine whether the driving privilege of that person should be suspended or revoked. In making the recommendation, the court shall state the basis for the belief that the condition exists and whether the defendant relied upon the condition as a part of his or her defense. The department may provide a form for the court’s convenience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 321, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13209.

Before sentencing a person upon a conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the court shall obtain from the department a record of any prior convictions of that person for traffic violations. The department shall furnish that record upon the written request of the court.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1449 of the Penal Code, in any such criminal action the time for pronouncement of judgment shall not commence to run until the time that the court receives the record of prior convictions from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 939, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------

13210.

In addition to the penalties set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 245 of the Penal Code, the court may order the suspension of the driving privilege of any operator of a motor vehicle who commits an assault as described in subdivision (a) of Section 245 of the Penal Code on an operator or passenger of another motor vehicle, an operator of a bicycle, or a pedestrian and the offense occurs on a highway. The suspension period authorized under this section for an assault commonly known as “road rage,” shall be six months for a first offense and one year for a second or subsequent offense to commence, at the discretion of the court, either on the date of the person’s conviction, or upon the person’s release from confinement or imprisonment. The court may, in lieu of or in addition to the suspension of the driving privilege, order a person convicted under this section to complete a court-approved anger management or “road rage” course, subsequent to the date of the current violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 642, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suspension and Revocation by Department [13350. - 13392.]

13350.

(a) The department immediately shall revoke the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of any of the following crimes or offenses:

(1) Failure of the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury or death to a person to stop or otherwise comply with Section 20001.

(2) A felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used, except as provided in Section 13351, 13352, or 13357.

(3) Reckless driving causing bodily injury.

(b) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546, 23550, or 23550.5, or a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5 or 23566, including a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code as provided in Section 193.7 of that code, the court shall, at the time of surrender of the driver’s license or temporary permit, require the defendant to sign an affidavit in a form provided by the department acknowledging his or her understanding of the revocation required by paragraph (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352, and an acknowledgment of his or her designation as a habitual traffic offender. A copy of this affidavit shall be transmitted, with the license or temporary permit, to the department within the prescribed 10 days.

(c) The department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under subdivision (a) until the expiration of one year after the date of revocation and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13350.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13350, for the purposes of this article, conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code is a conviction of a violation of Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.

(a) The department immediately shall revoke the privilege of a person to drive a motor vehicle upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of any of the following crimes or offenses:

(1) Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor vehicle, except when convicted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code.

(2) Conviction of three or more violations of Section 20001, 20002, 23103, 23104, or 23105 within a period of 12 months from the time of the first offense to the third or subsequent offense, or a combination of three or more convictions of violations within the same period.

(3) Violation of subdivision (a) of Section 191.5 or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of the Penal Code or of Section 2800.3 causing serious bodily injury resulting in a serious impairment of physical condition, including, but not limited to, loss of consciousness, concussion, serious bone fracture, protracted loss or impairment of function of any bodily member or organ, and serious disfigurement.

(b) The department shall not reinstate the privilege revoked under subdivision (a) until the expiration of three years after the date of revocation and until the person whose privilege was revoked gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 20.5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court showing that a person has been convicted of a felony for a violation of Section 245 of the Penal Code and that a vehicle was found by the court to constitute the deadly weapon or instrument used to commit that offense, the department immediately shall revoke the privilege of that person to drive a motor vehicle.

(b) The department shall not reinstate a privilege revoked under subdivision (a) under any circumstances.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department shall terminate any revocation order issued under this section on or after January 1, 1995, for a misdemeanor conviction of violating Section 245 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 606, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.8.

Upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court showing that the court has ordered the suspension of a driver’s license pursuant to Section 13210, on or after January 1, 2001, the department shall suspend the person’s driving privilege in accordance with that suspension order commencing either on the date of the person’s conviction or upon the person’s release from confinement or imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 642, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13351.85.

Upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of any court showing that a person has been convicted of a violation of Section 12110, the department shall suspend that person’s driving privilege for four months if the conviction was a first conviction, and for one year, if the conviction was a second or subsequent conviction of a violation of that section that occurred within seven years of the current conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 641, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13352.

(a) The department shall immediately suspend or revoke the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle upon the receipt of an abstract of the record of a court showing that the person has been convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1, or upon the receipt of a report of a judge of the juvenile court, a juvenile traffic hearing officer, or a referee of a juvenile court showing that the person has been found to have committed a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1. If an offense specified in this section occurs in a vehicle defined in Section 15210, the suspension or revocation specified in this subdivision applies also to the noncommercial driving privilege. The commercial driving privilege shall be disqualified
 as specified in Sections 15300 to 15302, inclusive. For the purposes of this section, suspension or revocation shall be as follows:

(1) (A) Except as provided in this subparagraph, or as required under Section 13352.1 or 13352.4, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23536, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of six months. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code. If the court, as authorized under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 23646, elects to order a person to enroll in, participate in, and complete either program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, the
 department shall require that program in lieu of the program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. Except when the court has ordered installation of a functioning, certified ignition interlock device pursuant to Section 23575.3, the department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The underlying conviction was not only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides to the department, subsequent to the violation date
 of the current underlying conviction, enrollment in, or completion of, a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23538 of this code.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(v) The person provides proof of financial
 responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vi) The person pays all reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(vii) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restrictions described in this paragraph shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(2) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23554, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of one year. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof
 satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23556 of this code. If the court, as authorized under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 23646, elects to order a person to enroll in, participate in, and complete either program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, the department shall require that program in lieu of the program described in Section 23556. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The underlying conviction was not only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of enrollment in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23556 of this code.

(II) Proof of enrollment in a program described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542, if the court has ordered the person to enroll in, participate in, and complete either program described in that section, in which case the person shall not be required to provide the proof described in subclause (I).

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vii) The person pays
 all reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(viii) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(3) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph or in Section 13352.5, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23540, the privilege shall be suspended for two years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety
 Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23542 of this code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction was only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of
 enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(II) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3, if the underlying conviction involved the use of alcohol.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vii) The person pays all reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(viii) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(4) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23560, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of three years. The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, and the person gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23562 of this code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s
 license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction was only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(II) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the
 county of the person’s residence or employment.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3, if the underlying conviction involved the use of alcohol.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as
 defined in Section 16430.

(vii) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(viii) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(5) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of three years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person files proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the
 department of successful completion of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as described in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 23548 of this code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction was only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(II) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3, if the underlying conviction involved the use of alcohol.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under Section 23575.3, if applicable.

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vii) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23546 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(viii) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(ix) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(6) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5 or 23566, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of five years. The privilege may not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code as described in subdivision (b) of Section 23568 of this code, or if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code.
 For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction was only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed
 pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(II) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3, if the underlying conviction involved alcohol.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vii) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23566 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(viii) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(ix) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(7) (A) Except as provided in this paragraph, upon a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23550 or 23550.5, or of a violation of Section 23153 punishable under Section 23550.5, the privilege shall be revoked for a period of four years. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person files proof of financial
 responsibility and gives proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or a program specified in Section 8001 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall occur subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit shall not be given to any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation. The department shall advise the person that they may apply to the department for a restricted driver’s license if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(i) Completion of 12 months of the suspension period if the underlying conviction was only for the use of drugs, as defined in Section 312, at the time of the violation.

(ii) The person satisfactorily provides, subsequent to the violation date of the current underlying conviction, either of the following:

(I) Proof of enrollment in an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if a 30-month program is unavailable in the person’s county of residence or employment.

(II) Proof of enrollment in a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment.

(iii) The person agrees, as a condition of the restriction, to continue satisfactory participation in the program described in clause (ii).

(iv) The person complies with Section 23575.3, if the underlying conviction involved alcohol.

(v) The person does both of the following:

(I) Submits the “Verification of Installation” form described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386.

(II) Agrees to maintain the functioning, certified ignition interlock device as required under subdivision (i).

(vi) The person provides proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(vii) An individual convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under Section 23550 may also, at any time after sentencing, petition the court for referral to an 18-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, or, if available in the county of the person’s residence or employment, a 30-month driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. Unless good cause is shown, the court shall order the referral.

(viii) The person pays all applicable reinstatement or reissue fees and any restriction fee required by the department.

(ix) The person pays to the department a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable costs of administering the requirements of this paragraph, as determined by the department.

(B) The restriction shall remain in effect for the period required in subdivision (e).

(8) (A) Upon a conviction or finding of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23109 that is punishable under subdivision (e) of that section or Section 23109.1, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of 90 days to six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(B) Commencing January 1, 2029, upon a finding of a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 23109 for engaging in a motor vehicle exhibition of speed, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 23109, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of 90 days to six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall
 not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(9) Upon a conviction or finding of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 23109 that is punishable under subdivision (f) of that section, the privilege shall be suspended for a period of six months, if ordered by the court. The privilege shall not be reinstated until the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(b) For the purposes of paragraphs (2) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the finding of the juvenile court judge, the juvenile hearing officer, or the referee of a juvenile court of a commission of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, subdivision (a) of Section 23109, or Section 23109.1, as specified in subdivision (a) of this section, is a conviction.

(c) A
 judge of a juvenile court, juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile court shall immediately report the findings specified in subdivision (a) to the department.

(d) A conviction of an offense in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23152, is a conviction of Section 23152 for the purposes of this section, and a conviction of an offense that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23153, is a conviction of Section 23153 for the purposes of this section. The department shall suspend or revoke the privilege to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to this section upon receiving notice of that conviction.

(e) (1) The restricted driving privilege shall become effective when the department
 receives all of the documents and fees required under paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and, except as specified in paragraph (2) or (3), shall remain in effect until all reinstatement requirements are satisfied.

(2) For the purposes of the restriction conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (a), the department shall terminate the restriction imposed pursuant to this section and shall suspend or revoke the person’s driving privilege upon receipt of notification from the driving-under-the-influence program that the person has failed to comply with the program requirements. The person’s driving privilege shall remain suspended or revoked for the remaining period of the original suspension or revocation imposed under this section and until all reinstatement requirements described in this section are met.

(3) The department shall